Florida, session 2026, HB97.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (5) of section
163.3180, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
163.3180 Concurrency.—
(5)
(d) The premise of concurrency is that the public
facilities will be provided in order to achieve and maintain the
adopted level of service standard. A comprehensive plan that
imposes transportation concurrency shall contain appropriate
amendments to the capital improvements element of the
comprehensive plan, consistent with the requirements of s.
163.3177(3). The capital improvements element shall identify
facilities necessary to meet adopted levels of service during a
5-year period or to maintain current levels of service for small
counties as defined in s. 339.2818(2).
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb97-00